Utah statutes.
26-21-15.   Action by department for injunction.

Notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy, the department may, in the manner provided by law, upon the advice of the attorney general, who shall represent the department in the proceedings, maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or other process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent the establishment, conduct, management, or operation of a health care facility which is in violation of this chapter or rules adopted by the committee.

